Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 179 County Road Engineer and Maintenance of Public Roads
179.470.
Maintenance of subdivision roads in counties.

In counties containing a city with a population equal to or greater than eight thousand (8,000) but less than twenty thousand (20,000), and not containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government, any street or road located outside of the corporate limits of an incorporated city which is a street or road of a subdivision established by a recorded plat that dedicates the street or road to public use, shall be maintained by the fiscal court of the county in the same manner that roads established under KRS

178.115

are maintained, if the street or road is at least one thousand (1,000) feet in length and at least fifty percent (50%) of the lots abutting the street or road contain houses which are occupied, and the street or road has been or shall be so constructed as to meet the approval of the county road engineer or, if there is no county road engineer, the approval of the fiscal court, such approval being based upon the established standards for county road construction within the county.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 178.010(2), in counties containing a city of the first class or a consolidated local government, any street or road located in the area of the county not within a city with a population that equals or exceeds three thousand (3,000) or within the area formerly comprising a city of the first class, which is a street or road of a subdivision that dedicated the street or road to public use, may be maintained by the fiscal court of the county or consolidated local government as the case may be, in the same manner as provided in subsection (1) and subject to the same conditions. In addition, street lights and other improvements already established may be maintained by the fiscal court or consolidated local government. The county or consolidated local government shall be reimbursed for the cost of such maintenance by the abutting property owner whose proportionate share of the cost of maintenance shall be added to the owner’s county tax bill and collected in the same manner as other taxes.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 178.010(2), in counties containing a population between eighty thousand (80,000) and one hundred fifteen thousand (115,000) and a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) or in counties containing a city with a population that is less than eight thousand (8,000) and not a city with a population that equals or exceeds eight thousand (8,000), any street or road in an unincorporated area or a city with a population of less than one thousand (1,000) of the county, which is at least two hundred (200) feet in length and dedicated to public use, may be maintained by the fiscal court of the county in the same manner as provided in subsection (1) of this section. In addition, street lights, garbage collection, water, and sewer services may be provided by the fiscal court. The county shall be reimbursed for the cost of such maintenance and services by the abutting property owner whose proportionate share of the cost of maintenance and services shall be added to the owner’s county tax bill and collected in the same manner as county taxes. Further, upon the petition of fifty percent (50%) or more of the abutting property owners of the street or road, the fiscal court may by proper resolution provide for the improvements.

No street or road shall be accepted by a fiscal court or consolidated local government under the provisions of subsection (2) or (3) of this section for county maintenance unless twenty-five percent (25%) of the abutting property owners petition the fiscal court or consolidated local government for county maintenance. The fiscal court or consolidated local government within thirty (30) days thereafter shall hold a public hearing on the petition. If fifty percent (50%) of the abutting property owners agree in writing to accept county maintenance, the fiscal court of the county or the consolidated local government may maintain the road or street in the same manner as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section as applicable and subject to the same conditions.

For the purposes of this section, the population of a city shall be determined by using the most recent federal decennial census data.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 5; 1956, ch. 217; 1972, ch. 79, § 1; 1976, ch. 337, § 1; 1980, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2002, ch. 346, § 193, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 92, § 253, effective January 1, 2015.

179.480.
Dust control treatment of county road by producers transporting natural resources thereon.

Upon a finding by the fiscal court that there exists an unabated dust nuisance on a county road resulting from the transportation of natural resources by truck, said court may require the producers of the natural resources that are being hauled on said road to treat said road to control dust. Said producer or producers shall be notified of the fiscal court’s finding by certified mail and shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to treat said road to control dust prior to the county fiscal court initiating dust control treatment. The cost of treatment shall be apportioned among all producers of natural resources using said road. If a producer does not pay his proportionate share within sixty (60) days of the mailing of the bill, the fiscal court may prohibit the movement of the producer’s natural resources on county roads until the charges are paid.

The proportionate share of costs of any producer shall be determined as the percentage which the tonnage of natural resources hauled by or for the producer over county roads bears to the total tonnage of natural resources hauled on the county roads. The fiscal court shall consult with producers to devise an equitable method for determining proportionate cost shares before instituting charges, but the fiscal court shall be the final authority in determining proportionate costs.

Treatment of county roads for dust pursuant to this section shall not include paving, or laying of rock.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 373, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.